apertium-ita.ita.dix
<pardef n="succe/dere__vblex">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>derebber</l>  <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>derebbero</l> <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>derebbe</l>   <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>deran</l>     <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>deranno</l>   <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>derà</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dendo</l>     <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dendo</l>     <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantando"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dettero</l>   <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssero</l>     <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dette</l>     <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dan</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dano</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>der</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dere</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>der</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>devan</l>     <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>devano</l>    <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>deva</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>desser</l>    <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dessero</l>   <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>desse</l>     <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dute</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sse</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantate"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>duta</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssa</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssa</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantata"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>duti</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssi</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ssi</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantati"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>duto</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sso</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sso</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantato"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>don</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dono</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>dan</l>       <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dano</l>      <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>dere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  

<e lm="succedere">       <i>succe</i><par n="succe/dere__vblex"/></e>
